Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4722
Members; removal; grounds.

Members may be removed by the Governor for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or misconduct in office, but only after delivering to the member a copy of the charges and affording such member an opportunity to be publicly heard in person, or by counsel, in his or her own defense, upon not less than ten days' notice.

Laws 1979, LB 101, § 3.